Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 29.1. Greyhound Racing.

§ 59.1-405.1.
Greyhound racing and simulcasting prohibited; penalty.

No person shall hold, conduct or operate any greyhound races for public exhibition in the Commonwealth for monetary remuneration.

No person shall transmit or receive interstate or intrastate simulcasting of greyhound races for commercial purposes in the Commonwealth.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

History.
1995, c. 19.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.